Utah statutes.
58-11a-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Barbering, Cosmetology/Barbering, Esthetics, Electrology, and Nail Technology Licensing Board consisting of nine members as follows:

(a)  one barber or cosmetologist/barber;

(b) (i)  one barber or cosmetologist/barber instructor; or

(ii)  one representative of a licensed barber or cosmetology/barber school;

(c)  one master esthetician;

(d) (i)  one esthetician instructor; or

(ii)  one representative of a licensed esthetics school;

(e)  one nail technician;

(f) (i)  one nail technician instructor; or

(ii)  one representative of a licensed nail technician school;

(g)  one electrologist; and

(h)  two members from the general public.

(2) (a)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(b) (i)  At least one of the members of the board appointed under Subsections (1)(b), (d), and (f) shall be an instructor at or a representative of a public school.

(ii)  At least one of the members of the board appointed under Subsections (1)(b), (d), and (f) shall be an instructor at or a representative of a private school.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board are in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Amended by Chapter 209, 2007 General Session

